Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1461.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Appropriation; Arizona health care cost containment system; allied health care workforce development program; definition A. The sum of $5,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona health care cost containment system to establish an allied health care workforce development program to develop the allied health care workforce in this state. B. The Arizona health care cost containment system shall distribute the monies to a nonprofit organization that meets all of the following: 1. Is solely dedicated to training allied health care workers through direct programs and education partners. 2. Has established partnerships with employers, education institutions and public agencies. 3. Has graduated at least seven thousand students before the effective date of this section. 4. Has maintained an active presence in at least eight states. 5. Is able to demonstrate the capacity to graduate a minimum of one thousand students through the allied health care workforce development program established pursuant to subsection A of this section. C. For the purposes of this section, "allied health care worker" means an individual who contributes to the delivery of health or related services in roles that are distinct from physicians and registered nurses and that typically require specialized training beyond a high school diploma but less than a bachelor's degree.